District of Columbia statutes.
16-1112

Expiration of title pending suit; damages.

If the title of the plaintiff in ejectment expires after the commencement of his action but before the trial, and but for the expiration he would have been entitled to recover, the verdict shall find the facts, and the plaintiff may recover his damages sustained by the wrongful withholding of the possession.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 566, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(n), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1112.
1973 Ed., § 16-1112.